Colorado, session 2026A, HB1092.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that certified nurse midwives and certified midwives
licensed in Colorado are qualified health-care professionals authorized to
practice independently within their education, training, and national
certification.
(2) The general assembly further finds and declares that:
(a) Inconsistent hospital credentialing practices have limited
access to midwifery care despite state law authorizing independent
practice; and
(b) Nondiscriminatory medical staff privileging is necessary to
protect patient access, continuity of care, and public health.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-3-135 as
follows:
25-3-135. Certified nurse midwife - certified midwife -
nondiscrimination with respect to the granting, use, or exercise of
medical staff privileges at public health facilities - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "CERTIFIED MIDWIFE" MEANS A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 12-255-104 (3.2), WITH PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY
PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-255-112.
(b) "CERTIFIED NURSE MIDWIFE" MEANS AN ADVANCED PRACTICE
REGISTERED NURSE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 12-255-104 (1), WITH
PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-255-112 WHO IS
-2- HB26-1092

AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-255-111 (2) TO USE THE TITLE
"CERTIFIED NURSE MIDWIFE" OR THE ABBREVIATION "C.N.M."
(c) "LICENSEE" MEANS A CERTIFIED NURSE MIDWIFE OR A
CERTIFIED MIDWIFE.
(d) "PUBLIC HEALTH FACILITY" MEANS A HEALTH FACILITY
CERTIFIED PURSUANT TO SECTION 25-1.5-103 (1)(a)(II).
(2) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A
PUBLIC HEALTH FACILITY THAT OFFERS LABOR AND CHILDBIRTH SERVICES
SHALL NOT DENY, RESTRICT, OR CONDITION THE GRANTING, USE, OR
EXERCISE OF FULL MEDICAL STAFF PRIVILEGES TO A LICENSEE ENGAGING
IN INDEPENDENT PRACTICE WITHIN THEIR SCOPE OF PRACTICE SOLELY ON
THE BASIS OF THEIR LICENSURE.
(b) PUBLIC HEALTH FACILITY PRIVILEGES EXTENDED TO A
LICENSEE MUST:
(I) INCLUDE DIRECT ADMITTING PRIVILEGES AND DIRECT
DISCHARGE PRIVILEGES, WITHOUT A REQUIREMENT FOR COSIGNATURE BY
A MEDICAL DOCTOR OR DOCTOR OF OSTEOPATHY;
(II) BE CONSISTENT WITH THE PRIVILEGES OF OTHER MEDICAL
STAFF; AND
(III) PERMIT A LICENSEE TO EXERCISE THE SAME VOTING RIGHTS
AS OTHER MEMBERS OF THE MEDICAL STAFF.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED AS LIMITING
OR AFFECTING THE AUTHORITY OF OTHER ADVANCED PRACTICE
REGISTERED NURSES TO PRACTICE IN A HEALTH FACILITY OR TO SEEK
MEDICAL STAFF PRIVILEGES CONSISTENT WITH THE ADVANCED PRACTICE
REGISTERED NURSE'S SCOPE OF PRACTICE PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 255 OF
TITLE 12.
-3- HB26-1092

SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB26-1092